Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5450.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 3113. (1) A county, city, village, or township shall not regulate those aspects of food service establishments that are subject to regulation under this act except to the extent necessary to carry out the responsibility of a local health department to implement licensing provisions of chapter IV. This chapter section does not relieve the an applicant for a license or a licensee from responsibility for securing a local permit or complying with applicable local codes, regulations, or ordinances not in conflict with this act. (2) A county, city, village, or township shall not adopt a rule, regulation, code, or ordinance that imposes or collects a fee, tax, or assessment for the operation of a mobile food establishment.